Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB200.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) The state of Kansas is hereby designated as a purple
heart state in recognition of the many citizens of the state who have earned
the purple heart medal as a result of being wounded while engaged in
combat with an enemy force.
(b) Each year, the governor shall issue a proclamation recognizing the
purple heart day, to be observed on August 7 of each year, following the
tradition established by George Washington in 1782 and revived in 1932
that distinguishes the purple heart as a decoration of honor awarded to
members of the armed forces and United States citizens who were
honorably wounded in action. The award has been limited to members of
the military since 1997 by congressional action.
(c) The executive director of the office of veterans services shall
promote the observance of purple heart day with appropriate activities and
direct each local chapter of all veterans' organizations to plan special
activities and events to honor the purple heart recipients in each chapter.
(d) All residents of this state are enjoined to devote some portion of
purple heart day to recognizing and commemorating the recipients of the
purple heart who have demonstrated a commitment to fighting for the
ideals that have made this nation great, have served this nation so valiantly
and are role models for all to emulate.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.